Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 3.2. Electronic Registration.

§ 24.2-416.7.
Application for voter registration by electronic means.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who is qualified to register to vote may apply to register to vote by electronic means as authorized by the State Board by completing an electronic registration application.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a registered voter may satisfy the requirements of §§

24.2-423

and

24.2-424

to notify the general registrar of a change of legal name or place of residence within the Commonwealth by electronic means as authorized by the State Board by completing an electronic registration application.

An electronic registration application completed pursuant to this article shall require that an applicant:

Provide the information as required under §

24.2-418

;

Have a Virginia driver’s license or other document issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles under Chapter 3 (§

46.2-300

et seq.) of Title 46.2;

Provide a social security number and Department of Motor Vehicles customer identifier number that matches the applicant’s record in the Department of Motor Vehicles records;

Attest to the truth of the information provided;

Sign the application in a manner consistent with the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (§ 59.1-479 et seq.); and

Affirmatively authorize the Department of Elections and general registrar to use the applicant’s signature obtained by the Department of Motor Vehicles for voter registration purposes.

In order for an individual to complete a transaction under this article, the general registrar shall verify that the Department of Motor Vehicles customer identifier number, date of birth, and social security number provided by the applicant match the information contained in the Department of Motor Vehicles records.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall provide to the Department of Elections a digital copy of the applicant’s signature on record with the Department of Motor Vehicles.

The Department of Elections shall transmit to the general registrar an applicant’s completed voter registration application and digital signature not later than five business days after the date of receipt.

Each transaction taking place under this section shall be accompanied by the following statement featured prominently in boldface capital letters: “WARNING: INTENTIONALLY MAKING A MATERIALLY FALSE STATEMENT DURING THIS TRANSACTION CONSTITUTES THE CRIME OF ELECTION FRAUD, WHICH IS PUNISHABLE UNDER VIRGINIA LAW AS A FELONY. VIOLATORS MAY BE SENTENCED TO UP TO 10 YEARS IN PRISON, OR UP TO 12 MONTHS IN JAIL AND/OR FINED UP TO $2,500.”

The Department of Elections may use additional security measures approved by the State Board to ensure the accuracy and integrity of registration transactions performed under this article.

History.

2013, c. 520; 2015, c. 740; 2020, cc. 1227, 1246.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 substituted “Department of Elections” for “State Board” in subdivision C 6 and subsections E, F and H; and added “approved by the State Board” in subsection H.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1227 and 1246, effective January 1, 2021, are identical, and in subdivision C 2, substituted “other document” for “special identification card” and added “under Chapter 3 (§

46.2-300

et seq.) of Title 46.2.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Electronic signatures. —

Although no law requires the acceptance of mailed voter registration applications with electronic signatures, the State Board of Elections is not precluded from directing that general registrars accept such applications, and the State Board, in its discretion, may do so. The State Board also has discretionary authority to establish criteria to preserve the security of confidential voter information and to ensure the authenticity and validity of electronic signatures. See opinion of Attorney General to Messrs. James M. Hinshaw, Daniel H. Haworth, W. Donald Brown, City of Norfolk Electoral Board, 13-111, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 47 (9/26/14).